Nebraska, session 109, LB624.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB624 LB624
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $10,000,000 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $10,000,000 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the State Treasurer for state aid.
There is included in the appropriation in this section $10,000,000
from the General Fund for FY2025-26 and $10,000,000 from the General Fund
for FY2026-27 as state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $10,000,000 from
the General Fund annually to the State Treasurer to contract to provide
education scholarships to low-income and at-risk elementary and secondary
students to increase their access to educational choice and opportunities
at approved or accredited private, denominational, or parochial schools.
The appropriation shall only be used for such purpose.
-2-